Washington statutes.
RCW 15.49.470

Moneys, disposition—Fees, fines, penalties and forfeitures of district courts, remittance.

All moneys collected under the provisions of this chapter shall be paid to the director and deposited in an account within the agricultural local fund. Such deposits shall be used only in the administration and enforcement of this chapter. Any residual balance remaining in the seed fund on June 9, 1988, shall be transferred to that account within the agricultural local fund. All fees, fines, forfeitures and penalties collected or assessed by a district court because of the violation of a state law shall be remitted as provided in chapter 3.62 RCW as now exists or is later amended.

[ 1988 c 254 s 2; 1987 c 202 s 176; 1975 1st ex.s. c 257 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 199 s 13; 1969 c 63 s 47.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.

Effective date—1975 1st ex.s. c 257: See note following RCW 15.13.470.